dev/guesser/guesser.lexc
LEXICON NUM-DIGIT

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>:%- SUBST-NONOM ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

%<num%>%<ord%>:%-%{I%}нш%{I%} # ;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%-%{I%}нш%{I%} # ;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%-%{I%}нш%{I%} SUBST-NONOM ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%-ш%{I%} # ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%-ш%{I%} # ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%-ш%{I%} SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

%<num%>%<coll%>%<advl%>:%-%{A%}у # ;
%<num%>%<coll%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%-%{A%}у # ;
%<num%>%<coll%>%<subst%>:%-%{A%}у SUBST-NONOM ;

%<num%>%<percent%>%<nom%>:%% # ;

%<num%>%<percent%>:%%%{а%}%{з%}%- SUBST-NONOM ;
%<num%>%<percent%>:%%%{а%}%{з%} SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<percent%>:%%%{э%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<percent%>:%%%{э%}%{с%} SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

°С%<num%>:°С # ;
°С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:°С # ;
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:°С%{а%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ;
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:°С%{э%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>:ºС # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:ºС # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:ºС%{а%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:ºС%{э%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>:С # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:С # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:С%{а%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:С%{э%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

С%<num%>:° # ; ! Dir/LR
С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:° # ; ! Dir/LR
С%<num%>%<subst%>:°%{а%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
С%<num%>%<subst%>:°%{э%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

! Measurement units

км:км SQRD ;
мм:мм SQRD ;
см:см SQRD ;
м:м SQRD ;

LEXICON LASTDIGIT

1:1%{э%}%{й%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "бір"
2:2%{э%}                NUM-DIGIT ; ! "екі"
3:3%{э%}%{с%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "үш"
4:4%{э%}%{с%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "төрт"
5:5%{э%}%{с%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "бес"
6:6%{а%}                NUM-DIGIT ; ! "алты"
7:7%{э%}                NUM-DIGIT ; ! "жеті"
8:8%{э%}%{з%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "сегіз"
9:9%{а%}%{з%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "тоғыз"

LEXICON LASTDIGIT-REST

1%0:1%0%{а%}%{н%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "он"
2%0:2%0%{а%}            NUM-DIGIT ; ! "қырық"
3%0:3%0%{а%}%{з%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "отыз"
4%0:4%0%{а%}%{с%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "қырық"
5%0:5%0%{э%}%{й%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "елу"
6%0:6%0%{а%}%{с%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "алпыс"
7%0:7%0%{э%}%{с%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "жетпіс"
8%0:8%0%{э%}%{н%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "сексен"
9%0:9%0%{а%}%{н%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "тоқсан"

LEXICON POWERS
%0%0:%0%0%{э%}%{з%}     NUM-DIGIT ; ! "жүз"
%0%0%0:%0%0%0%{а%}%{н%} NUM-DIGIT ; ! "мың"

LEXICON LOOP

%,:%, DIGITLEX ;
%.:%. DIGITLEX ;
%,:%, LASTDIGIT ;
%.:%. LASTDIGIT ;
%,:%, LASTDIGIT-REST ;
%.:%. LASTDIGIT-REST ;
%,:%, POWERS ;
%.:%. POWERS ;
      DIGITLEX ;
      LASTDIGIT ;
      LASTDIGIT-REST ;
      POWERS ;

LEXICON DIGITLEX

%0:%0 LOOP ;
1:1   LOOP ;
2:2   LOOP ;
3:3   LOOP ;
4:4   LOOP ;
5:5   LOOP ;
6:6   LOOP ;
7:7   LOOP ;
8:8   LOOP ;
9:9   LOOP ;

!==============================================================================!
!          N U M E R A L     L E X I C O N     E N D S     H E R E
!==============================================================================!

!==============================================================================!
! CLITICS
!==============================================================================!

! First, let's list all the clitics we have

LEXICON CLIT-EMPH

%+шы%<emph%>:%>ш%{I%} # ;
# ;

LEXICON CLIT-QST-MA

%+ма%<qst%>:%>% %{M%}%{A%} # ;

LEXICON CLIT-QST

CLIT-QST-MA ;
%+мекен%<qst%>:% %{M%}екен # ;

LEXICON CLIT-MODEMO

%+ау%<mod_emo%>:%-ау # ;
%+ай%<mod_emo%>:%-ай # ;

LEXICON CLIT-MODASS

%+ғой%<mod_ass%>:% %{G%}ой # ;
# ;

LEXICON CLIT-GHANA-ETC

%+%-ақ%<postadv%>:%-ақ # ; ! ""
%+ғана%<postadv%>:% %{G%}ана # ; ! ""
%+да%<cnjcoo%>:% %{D%}%{A%} # ; ! ""
%+да%<postadv%>:% %{D%}%{A%} # ; ! ""
%+шығар%<mod%>:% шығар # ; ! ""
# ;

LEXICON CLIT-COP

%+е%<cop%>%<aor%>: V-PERS-S1 ;

! Now, let's group them depending on what they can attach to

LEXICON CLITICS-NO-COP

CLIT-QST ;
CLIT-MODASS ;
CLIT-MODEMO ;
CLIT-EMPH ;
CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

LEXICON CLITICS-NO-COP-NO-QST

CLIT-MODASS ;
CLIT-MODEMO ;
CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

LEXICON CLITICS-INCL-COP         ! Can appear only after nominals
                                 ! (and only after some cases).
CLITICS-NO-COP ;
CLIT-COP ;

!==============================================================================!
!                         NOMINAL INFLECTION
! This section contains everything needed to describe inflection of nominals.
! It starts with the LEXICON FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION
!==============================================================================!

!-------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! The following combinations are possible (examples in Tatar):
!
! stem(plural) > case                                     # әти<nom>, әтине<acc>
!----
! stem(plural) > possessives > case                       !# әтиемне<px1sg><acc>
! stem(plural) > possessives > ныкы/дагы/дай(*1)
                                               !# әтиемнеке,китабындагы,әтиемдәй
! stem(plural) > possessives > ныкы > case
! stem(plural) > possessives > дагы(plural(*2)) > case
                                   !# Монда _эчеңдәгене_ тышка чыгарырга ярамый.
! stem(plural) > possessives > дагы(plural) > possessives > case
                     !# _Эчендәгесе_(*3) – тышында, диләр андый кешеләр турында.
!----
! stem(plural) > ныкы/дагы/дай                         !# әтинеке/әтидәге/әтидәй
! stem(plural) > ныкы/дагы > case  !#Бу соңгы _еллардагының_ өчтән икесе чамасы.
!-----
! stem(plural) > сыз
! stem > сыз(plural) > case
! stem > сыз(plural) > possessives > case
!----
! *1. "ныкы" form in some Tatar grammars is called "predicative genitive".
!     Indeed, when not substantivized, it is used as a predicate:
!     "Бу яулык әнинеке." (vs "Әнинең яулыгы.)
!
!     Currently we don't mark it with a <subst> tag, but probably we should,
!     since we let it continue with case tags.
!
!     An alternative to a [predicative general possessive <px>] vs
!     [substantivized general possessive <px>subst>] opposition is to view it as
!     an always substantivized thing and hence mark it with a <subst> tag
!     (see e.g. https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Turkic_languages/Ki)
!     At the end of sentences it will have attached copulas, which will indicate
!     predicative use anyway.
! *2. TODO: Does double plural in a word make sence? Ерак илләрдәгеләр looks ok,
!     and occurs in the RFERL copus (though very rarely). Plural affix both
!     before and after the the general possessive does not look ok.
! *3. This doesn't work atm (it's recursive), but it doesn't seem to be very
!     frequent also.
!     Most likely it is restricted to px3sp.
!-------------------------------------------------------------------------------

!-------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! A note on abessive SIZ:
! It doesn't appear after possessives.
! We don't let it take copula suffixes here. A counterexample could be e.g.
! "жұмыс-сыз-бын", but that's only because "жұмыссыз" has lexicalized as an
! adjective (try to grep "с[ыі]з[мбп][ыі]н" on a large corpora -- that's just a
! few words which are rather  adjectives.
!-------------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON CASES-COMMON

%<gen%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}ң CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<acc%>:%>%{N%}%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<ins%>:%>%{M%}ен CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON CASES

CASES-COMMON ;
%<nom%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

!! LEXICON CASES-WITHOUT-COPULAS
!! 
!! CASES-COMMON ;
!! %<nom%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!! %<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!! %<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON ATTR-SUBST

%<attr%>: # ;
%<subst%>: CASES ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES ;

LEXICON GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC

!------------------------------------------------------------------------------!
! <n.pl.нікі.pl> sequence should not be allowed. This form is rare (1 (!)
! match in RFERL corpus for 'нікілар'), probably not worh bothering at all.
! It could be handled in a way abessive is handled, but since NIKI in contrast
! to the abessive SIZ can appear after possessves, that would require
! duplicating possessives as well.
!------------------------------------------------------------------------------!
! try нікілер?  -JNW

!gen.subst part was:
!%<px%>:%>%{N%}ікі%{n%} CASES ;
!%<px%>%<pl%>:%>%{N%}ікі%>л%{A%}р CASES ;

%<gen%>%<subst%>:%>%{N%}ікі%{n%} CASES ;
%<gen%>%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{N%}ікі%>л%{A%}р CASES ;

%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%{G%}%{I%} ATTR-SUBST ;
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й CLITICS-NO-COP ;  ! Probably should be CLITICS-INCL-COP, same for all <sim> -JNW 2015-01-17

LEXICON CASES-ETC

CASES ;
GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC ;

LEXICON POSSESSIVES

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м CASES-ETC ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң CASES-ETC ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}з CASES-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}ңд%{A%}р CASES-ETC ;

%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з CASES-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р CASES-ETC ;

LEXICON ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION

%+сыз%<post%>:%>с%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON LI-POSTPOSITION

%+лы%<post%>:%>%{L%}%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON PLURAL

%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES-ETC ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSIVES ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;

LEXICON FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION

PLURAL ;
CASES-ETC ;
POSSESSIVES ;
ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;
LI-POSTPOSITION ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     ADJECTIVE'S (ADJECTIVIAL) INFLECTION (ADJ-COMMON)

! FIXME: this section might need some refactoring
!! i.e. change <adj><comp><subst> to <adj><subst><comp>
!! and make use of ADJ-LEVELS class

!! LEXICON COMPARATIVE
!! 
!! %<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!! CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON A1                ! adjectives that can be both substantivised and andverbialised;
                          ! all three readings (<adj>, <adj.subst> and <adj.advl>) have comparison levels.
                          !# жақсы, тез

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;                             !# жақсы адам
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;   !# жақсырақ іс

%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;                             !# жақсыны таптым
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;   !# жақсырақты таптым

%<adj%>%<advl%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;                               !# жақсы білемін
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<advl%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;     !# "...ион көп болса соғұрлым тоқ жақсырақ өтеді."

LEXICON A2                 ! (derived/not fully lexicalised) adjectives without adverbial reading;
                           ! <adj> and <adj.subst> readings have comparison levels.
                           !# ескі

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;                             !# ескі дос
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;   !# ескірек заманда

%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;                             !# "Ол ескіні ертеден есінде сақтаған, жаңаның жалынды жаршысы болған ақын."
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;   !# "Ихтимал, бу бина башкасы, искерәге урынында утырадыр."

LEXICON A3                 ! (derived/not fully lexicalised) adjectives without adverbial reading,
                           ! so-called "predicatives" (бар, жоқ);
                           ! no comparison levels at all.
                           !# көктемгі, басты, бар, жоқ

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;         !# көктемгі су тасқыны
%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;           !# "...Самаранч ең бастыны түсінді..."
                                    !# "Аты бардың заты бар."

! FIXME:NOTE:loc.attr/subst form of some of them seems to be pure overgeneration:
! e.g. *язгыдагы
